Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 5 Rights of Surviving Spouse

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

For case note, “Trusts & Estates—Spousal Disinheritance—Inter vivos Trusts and Wyoming's Spousal Elective Share. Briggs v. Wyoming Nat'l Bank, 836 P.2d 263,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 323 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Dower and Curtesy §§ 26 to 38; 80 Am. Jur. 2d Wills §§ 793, 1411 to 1413, 1415 to 1418.

Construction, application and effect of statutes which deny or qualify surviving spouse's right to elect against deceased spouse's will, 48 ALR4th 972.

97 C.J.S. Wills §§ 1841 to 1879.

§ 2-5-101.
Elective share of property.

If a married person domiciled in this state shall by will deprive the surviving spouse of more than the elective share, as hereafter set forth, of the property which is subject to disposition under the will, reduced by funeral and administration expenses, homestead allowance, family allowances and exemption, and enforceable claims, the surviving spouse has a right of election to take an elective share of that property as follows:

One-half (1/2) if there are no surviving issue of the decedent, or if the surviving spouse is also a parent of any of the surviving issue of the decedent; or

One-fourth (1/4), if the surviving spouse is not the parent of any surviving issue of the decedent.

If a married person not domiciled in this state dies, the right, if any, of the surviving spouse to take an elective share in property in this state is governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

If the surviving spouse of a married person domiciled in this state dies or becomes incompetent within three (3) months after the will is admitted to probate or before being advised of the right of election as in W.S.

2-5-104

provided, a personal representative or guardian of the estate of the deceased or incompetent surviving spouse has the same right of election as the surviving spouse would have had if living or competent.

If the surviving spouse or his personal representative or guardian fails to exercise the right of election within the time provided in W.S.

2-5-105

, the will shall govern and control the distribution of the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), substituted “W.S.

2-5-104

” for “W.S. 2-5-201.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Failure to advise. —

In light of the decedent's wife's acceptance of benefits under the will and the personal representative's failure to attempt to exercise the elective share, the omission of the advisement was not fundamental error which would cause the decree of distribution to exceed the probate court's jurisdiction. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

Life estate with special power of appointment not part of estate. —

Where a decedent's interest in property was a life estate with a special power of appointment, the property is not included as part of the decedent's estate for the purpose of computing his surviving spouse's elective share. Reno v. Reno, 626 P.2d 552,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1981).

Augmentation. —

Wyoming Supreme Court could not augment for purposes of the elective share the probate estate of the decedent with the property transferred to the trust prior to the decedent's death or with property transferred by will substitutes at the time of the decedent's death.
Poland v. Nalee (In re Estate of George), 2011 WY 157, 265 P.3d 222,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2011).

Cited

in

Connely v. McColloch (In re Estate of Drwenski), 2004 WY 5, 83 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status: validity and effect of mortmain statutes, 6 ALR4th 603.

What constitutes transfer outside the will precluding surviving spouse from electing statutory share under Uniform Probate Code § 2-301, 11 ALR4th 1213.

Statutory or constitutional provision allowing widow but not widower to take against will and receive dower interests, allowances, homestead rights, or the like as denial of equal protection of law, 18 ALR4th 910.

Prior institution of annulment proceedings or other attack on validity of one's marriage as barring or estopping one from entitlement to property rights as surviving spouse, 31 ALR4th 1190.

Surviving spouse's right to marital share as affected by valid contract to convey by will, 85 ALR4th 418.

§ 2-5-102.
Waiver of right of election and homestead allowance.

The right of election of a surviving spouse and the rights of the surviving spouse to homestead allowance, exempt property and family allowance, or any of them, may be waived totally or partially before or after marriage, by a written contract, agreement or waiver signed by the party waiving, after fair disclosure. Unless it provides to the contrary a waiver of “all rights” (or equivalent language) in the property or estate of a present or prospective spouse, or a complete property settlement entered into after or in anticipation of separation or divorce, is a waiver of all rights to elective share, homestead allowance, exempt property and family allowance by each spouse in the property of the other and a renunciation by each of all benefits which would otherwise pass to one from the other by intestate succession or by virtue of the provisions of any will executed before the waiver or property settlement.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

Briggs v. Wyoming Nat'l Bank, 836 P.2d 263,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutory or constitutional provision allowing widow but not widower to take against will and receive dower interests, allowances, homestead rights, or the like as denial of equal protection of law, 18 ALR4th 910.

§ 2-5-103.
Homestead allowance, exempt property and family allowance; exception.

A surviving spouse is entitled to homestead allowance, exempt property and family allowance whether or not he elects to take an elective share and whether or not he renounces the benefits conferred upon him by the will except that, if it clearly appears from the will that a provision therein made for the surviving spouse is intended to be in lieu of these rights, he is not so entitled if he does not renounce the provisions made for him in the will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutory or constitutional provision allowing widow but not widower to take against will and receive dower interests, allowances, homestead rights, or the like as denial of equal protection of law, 18 ALR4th 910.

§ 2-5-104.
Duty of court to advise as to right of election.

If the surviving spouse has a right of election under W.S.

2-5-101

, then at any time after the filing of an inventory and not more than three (3) months after the admission of the will to probate, the court shall advise the surviving spouse of his right of election and shall explain fully the right and that in the event of the failure to exercise the right of election the will shall govern and control the distribution of the estate.

If the surviving spouse dies or becomes incompetent before the court has advised him of his right of election and has not, prior to death or incompetency, filed a waiver or renunciation of the right of election, the court shall advise the personal representative or guardian of the estate of the deceased or incompetent surviving spouse of the right of election as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Failure to advise. —

In light of the decedent's wife's acceptance of benefits under the will and the personal representative's failure to attempt to exercise the elective share, the omission of the advisement was not fundamental error which would cause the decree of distribution to exceed the probate court's jurisdiction. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

§ 2-5-105.
Time limit and procedure for elective share.

The surviving spouse, or a personal representative or guardian of the estate of a deceased or incompetent surviving spouse, may elect to take his elective share in the estate by filing in the court and mailing or delivering to the personal representative, if any, a petition for the elective share within three (3) months after the admission of the will to probate or within thirty (30) days after being advised of the right of election, whichever limitation last expires. In the event of a failure to file a petition within the foregoing time limitation the will governs and controls the distribution of the estate.

After the filing of a petition to elect to take an elective share, the court shall set the petition for hearing and the surviving spouse, or his personal representative or guardian, shall give notice by certified mail not less than twenty (20) days before the date of hearing of the time and place set for hearing to all persons whose interest will be adversely affected by the taking of the elective share.

After notice and hearing the court shall determine the right to the elective share and shall order its payment from assets of the estate. An assignment or allotment of assets by the personal representative to the elective share need not be made until the entry of a decree of distribution or such other time as may be designated by the court.

The surviving spouse or his personal representative or guardian may withdraw his demand for an elective share at any time before entry of a final determination by the court of the right to an elective share.

Any time after having been advised of the right of election, the surviving spouse or his personal representative or guardian may file with the court a renunciation or waiver of the right of election in which event the will shall govern and control the distribution of the estate.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Failure to advise. —

In light of the decedent's wife's acceptance of benefits under the will and the personal representative's failure to attempt to exercise the elective share, the omission of the advisement was not fundamental error which would cause the decree of distribution to exceed the probate court's jurisdiction. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status: validity and effect of mortmain statutes, 6 ALR4th 603.

What constitutes transfer outside the will precluding surviving spouse from electing statutory share under Uniform Probate Code § 2-301, 11 ALR4th 1213.